Hawaii statutes.
[§572-12.1] Refusal to solemnize a
marriage. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a clergy,
minister, priest, rabbi, officer of any religious denomination or society, or
religious society not having clergy but providing solemnizations that is
authorized to perform solemnizations pursuant to this chapter shall not be
required to solemnize any marriage that is in violation of their religious
beliefs or faith.

(b) A clergy, minister, priest, rabbi, officer
of any religious denomination or society, or religious society not having
clergy but providing solemnizations that, pursuant to this section, fails or
refuses to perform the solemnization of a marriage shall be immune from any
fine, penalty, injunction, administrative proceeding, or any other legal or
administrative liability for the failure or refusal. [L Sp 2013 2d, c 1, pt of
§2]

Cross References

Refusal to join persons in a civil union, see §572B-4.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next